src-fst-morphology-affixes-adjectives.lexc.md
# Hill Mari adjective inflection

This file contains a handful of lexica, each with 3 subentries. The two first ones give +Pos+Attr dn +Comp:рак, respectively, whereeas the third entry gives a *+Der/N* tag and redirects to the relevant noun lexica for case inflection

## Temporary lexicon
* **LEXICON A-ADN_**  = This adjective only occurs with a head word in an adnominal phrase

## Ordinary lexica

* **LEXICON A_** has *aä* trigger, gets +Pos, +Comp, or goes via Der/N to NMN\_OLMA. 
This should be neutral 2013-05-11

* **LEXICON A_OLMA** has  *back* trigger, gets +Pos, +Comp, or goes via Der/N to NMN\_OLMA.

* **LEXICON A_AEZAE** has *front* trigger, gets +Pos, +Comp, or goes via Der/N to NMN_AAEZAE.

* **LEXICON A_MARY** has *back* trigger, gets +Pos, +Comp, or goes via Der/N to NMN\_MARY.

* **LEXICON A_TYERVYE** har *front* trigger, gets +Pos, +Comp, or goes via Der/N to NMN\_TYERVYE.

* **LEXICON A_KOL** has *back* trigger, gets +Pos, +Comp, or goes via Der/N to NMN\_KOL.
+Der+Der/N+N:%{back%} NMN_KOL ; The +N tag is given here to curtail over generation from derived nouns

* **LEXICON A_MOER** has *front* trigger, gets +Pos, +Comp, or goes via Der/N to NMN\_MOER.
 +Der+Der/N+N:%{front%} NMN_MOER ; The +N tag is given here to curtail over generation from derived nouns

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-mrj/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc)</small>

---
